Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
PART 3
PROVISIONAL BALLOTS

1-9-301 to 1-9-306. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire part repealed, p. 1425, § 56, effective June 6; entire part repealed, p. 1461, § 56, effective June 6.

Editor's note:

This part 3 was added in 2002. For amendments to this part 3 prior to its repeal in 2005, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.